Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-2009
Public Counsel; complaint; investigation; decision; notify complainant.

(1) The Public Counsel may receive a complaint from any person concerning an administrative act. The Public Counsel shall conduct a suitable investigation into the things complained of unless the Public Counsel believes that:

(a) The complainant has another remedy available which the complainant could reasonably be expected to use;

(b) The grievance pertains to a matter outside the Public Counsel's power;

(c) The complainant's interest is insufficiently related to the subject matter;

(d) The complaint is trivial, frivolous, vexatious, or not made in good faith;

(e) Other complaints are more worthy of attention;

(f) The Public Counsel's resources are insufficient for adequate investigation; or

(g) The complaint has been too long delayed to justify present examination of its merit.

(2) The Public Counsel's declining to investigate a complaint shall not bar the Public Counsel from proceeding on the Public Counsel's own motion to inquire into related problems. After completing consideration of a complaint, whether or not it has been investigated, the Public Counsel shall suitably inform the complainant and the administrative agency involved.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 8, p. 2882;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,247;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 9.